Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 3. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 34.20.140.
Recording memorandum extending lien.

Where the payment of an existing contract (a bill of exchange, promissory note, bond, or other evidence of indebtedness) is secured by an instrument creating a lien upon real estate, payment on the contract does not extend the lien beyond its original or extended period as against subsequent purchasers, optionees, mortgagees, creditors, or persons acquiring a lien upon the real estate, unless

a memorandum of the payment is recorded in the office of the recording district where the property is located;

the memorandum is recorded before the end of the statutory time for bringing an action upon the existing contract and extensions as exhibited by the terms of the recorded instrument; and

the memorandum is signed and acknowledged by the owner or the representative of the owner of the existing contract of indebtedness.

History.

(§ 22-3-46 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 105 SLA 1955)

Sec. 34.20.150.
Maturity of lien.

The date of maturity of an instrument creating a lien upon real property is considered to be 10 years from the date of the instrument, unless

the period of the instrument is disclosed by the terms of the instrument; or

another instrument extending the period of the first instrument or a memorandum of payment of the first instrument is recorded.

When an existing recorded instrument is recorded before March 26, 1955, which creates a lien upon real property but which does not disclose the period of the instrument, another instrument extending the period of the first instrument, or a memorandum of payment of the first instrument may be recorded before January 1, 1956.

History.

(§ 22-3-46 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 105 SLA 1955)

Sec. 34.20.160.
Notice of other remedies.

When a lender uses a note as evidence of an obligation secured by a mortgage or deed of trust, the note must affirmatively advise the mortgagor or trustor and any other party bound by the note if the mortgagee or beneficiary wants the option to bring suit directly on the note to collect an amount owing under the note without first foreclosing the mortgage or deed of trust. This option must be stated in writing within the note or as a separate document. If a note executed after May 24, 1988 fails to contain the notice specified in this section, the debt secured by the mortgage or deed of trust may be foreclosed under AS

09.45.170

—

09.45.220

or AS

34.20.070

—

34.20.135

.

If the mortgagee or beneficiary wishes to collect an amount owing under the note without first foreclosing the mortgage or deed of trust, the following language is sufficient in the note:

The mortgagor or trustor (borrower) is personally obligated and fully liable for the amount due under the note. The mortgagee or beneficiary (lender) has the right to sue on the note and obtain a personal judgment against the mortgagor or trustor for satisfaction of the amount due under the note either before or after a judicial foreclosure of the mortgage or deed of trust under AS

09.45.170

—

09.45.220

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 44 SLA 1988)